solthiruthi 0.2/ta_TA.aff
FLAG num
SFX	463	N	2
SFX	463		ல்	ற்கலாம்		ல்
SFX	463		ள்	ட்கலாம்		ள்

SFX	470	N	2
SFX	470		ா	ரும்படி		ா
SFX	470		0	லும்படி		ல்

SFX	480	N	2
SFX	480		ா	ரும்போது	ா
SFX	480		0	லும்போது	ல்

SFX	484	N	2
SFX	484		ா	ரும்போதெல்லாம்	ா
SFX	484		0	லும்போதெல்லாம்	ல்

SFX	490	N	2
SFX	490		ா	ரும்முன்	ா
SFX	490		0	லும்முன்	ல்

SFX	500	N	2
SFX	500		ா	ருகிறேன்	ா
SFX	500		0	கிறேன்	ல்

SFX	501	N	2
SFX	501		ா	ருகின்றேன்	ா
SFX	501		0	கின்றேன்		ல்

SFX	504	N	2
SFX	504		ா	ருகிறாய்	ா
SFX	504		0	கிறாய்	ல்

SFX	505	N	2
SFX	505		ா	ருகின்றாய்		ா
SFX	505		0	கின்றாய்		ல்

SFX	508	N	2
SFX	508		ா	ருகிறான்	ா
SFX	508		0	கிறான்	ல்

SFX	509	N	2
SFX	509		ா	ருகின்றான்		ா
SFX	509		0	கின்றான்		ல்

SFX	512	N	2
SFX	512		ா	ருகிறாள்	ா
SFX	512		0	கிறாள்	ல்

SFX	513	N	2
SFX	513		ா	ருகின்றாள்		ா
SFX	513		0	கின்றாள்		ல்

SFX	516	N	2
SFX	516		ா	ருகிறார்கள்	ா
SFX	516		0	கிறார்கள்		ல்

SFX	517	N	2
SFX	517		ா	ருகின்றார்கள்	ா
SFX	517		0	கின்றார்கள்	ல்

SFX	518	N	2
SFX	518		ா	ருகின்றனர்		ா
SFX	518		0	கின்றனர்		ல்

SFX	520	N	2
SFX	520		ா	ருகிறார்	ா
SFX	520		0	கிறார்		ல்

SFX	521	N	2
SFX	521		ா	ருகின்றார்	ா
SFX	521		0	கின்றார்	ல்

SFX	524	N	2
SFX	524		ா	ருகிறது	ா
SFX	524		0	கிறது	ல்

SFX	525	N	2
SFX	525		ா	ருகின்றது	ா
SFX	525		0	கின்றது	ல்

SFX	528	N	2
SFX	528		ா	ருகின்றன	ா
SFX	528		0	கின்றன	ல்

SFX	540	N	2
SFX	540		ா	ருகிற	ா
SFX	540		0	கிற		ல்

SFX	542	N	2
SFX	542		ா	ருகின்ற	ா
SFX	542		0	கின்ற	ல்

SFX	560	N	2
SFX	560		ா	ருகின்றபடி	ா
SFX	560		0	கின்றபடி	ல்

SFX	562	N	2
SFX	562		ா	ருகின்றபோது	ா
SFX	562		0	கின்றபோது	ல்

SFX	564	N	2
SFX	564		ா	ருகின்றபோதெல்லாம்	ா
SFX	564		0	கின்றபோதெல்லாம்	ல்

SFX	600	N	2
SFX	600		ா	ந்தேன்	ா
SFX	600		ல்	ன்றேன்	ல்

SFX	604	N	2
SFX	604		ா	ந்தாய்	ா
SFX	604		ல்	ன்றாய்	ல்

SFX	608	N	2
SFX	608		ா	ந்தான்	ா
SFX	608		ல்	ன்றான்	ல்

SFX	612	N	2
SFX	612		ா	ந்தாள்	ா
SFX	612		ல்	ன்றாள்	ல்

SFX	616	N	2
SFX	616		ா	ந்தார்கள்	ா
SFX	616		ல்	ன்றார்கள்	ல்

SFX	618	N	2
SFX	618		ா	ந்தனர்	ா
SFX	618		ல்	ன்றனர்	ல்

SFX	620	N	2
SFX	620		ா	ந்தார்		ா
SFX	620		ல்	ன்றார்	ல்

SFX	624	N	2
SFX	624		ா	ந்தது		ா
SFX	624		ல்	ன்றது	ல்

SFX	628	N	2
SFX	628		ா	ந்தன		ா
SFX	628		ல்	ன்றன	ல்

SFX	640	N	2
SFX	640		ா	ந்த		ா
SFX	640		ல்	ன்ற		ல்

SFX	660	N	2
SFX	660		ா	ந்தபடி	ா
SFX	660		ல்	ன்றபடி	ெல்

SFX	662	N	2
SFX	662		ா	ந்தபோது	ா
SFX	662		ல்	ன்றபோது	ெல்

SFX	664	N	2
SFX	664		ா	ந்தபோதெல்லாம்	ா
SFX	664		ல்	ன்றபோதெல்லாம்	ெல்

SFX	666	N	2
SFX	666		ா	ந்தபின்	ா
SFX	666		ல்	ன்றபின்	ெல்

SFX	668	N	2
SFX	668		ா	ந்தவாறு	ா
SFX	668		ல்	ன்றவாறு	ல்

SFX	700	N	2
SFX	700		ா	ரேன்		ா
SFX	700		0	லேன்	ல்

SFX	704	N	2
SFX	704		ா	ராய்		ா
SFX	704		0	லாய்		ல்

SFX	708	N	2
SFX	708		ா	ரான்		ா
SFX	708		0	லான்		ல்

SFX	712	N	2
SFX	712		ா	ராள்		ா
SFX	712		0	லாள்		ல்

SFX	716	N	2
SFX	716		ா	ரார்		ா
SFX	716		0	லார்		ல்

SFX	720	N	2
SFX	720		ா	ரா		ா
SFX	720		0	லா		ல்

SFX	730	N	2
SFX	730		ா	ராதே		ா
SFX	730		0	லாதே	ல்

SFX	732	N	2
SFX	732		ா	ராதீர்		ா
SFX	732		0	லாதீர்	ல்

SFX	734	N	2
SFX	734		ா	ராதீர்கள்	ா
SFX	734		0	லாதீர்கள்	ல்

SFX	740	N	2
SFX	740		ா	ராத		ா
SFX	740		0	லாத		ல்

SFX	741	N	2
SFX	741		0	ராத		ா

SFX	742	N	2
SFX	742		ா	ரா		ா
SFX	742		0	லா		ல

SFX	743	N	2
SFX	743		ா	ரா		ா

SFX	750	N	2
SFX	750		ா	ர		ா
SFX	750		0	ல		ல்

SFX	752	N	2
SFX	752		ா	ந்து		ா
SFX	752		ல்	ன்று		ல்

SFX	754	N	2
SFX	754		ா	ந்தால்	ா
SFX	754		ல்	ன்றால்	ல்

SFX	756	N	2
SFX	756		ா	ராமல்	ா
SFX	756		0	லாமல்	ல்

SFX	758	N	2
SFX	758		ா	ராது		ா
SFX	758		0	லாது		ல்

SFX	800	N	1
SFX	800		ா	ந்தடி		ா

SFX	802	N	1
SFX	802		ா	ரச்செய்	ா

SFX	804	N	1		
SFX	804		ா	ரப்பண்ணு	ா

SFX	806	N	1		
SFX	806		ா	ரவை	ா

SFX	900	N	1
SFX	900		0	ரும்		ா

SFX	904	N	1
SFX	904		0	ருங்கள்		ா
